District of Columbia statutes.
16-2381

Purpose of the subchapter; construction of provisions.

The general purpose of this subchapter is to:

(1)

Encourage stability in the lives of certain children who have been adjudicated to be neglected and have been removed from the custody of their parent by providing judicial procedures for the creation of a permanent guardianship in the circumstances set forth in this subchapter;

(2)

Ensure that the constitutional rights of all parties are recognized and enforced in all proceedings conducted pursuant to this subchapter while ensuring that the fundamental needs of children are not subjugated to the interests of others; and

(3)

Increase the opportunities for the prompt permanent placement of children, especially with relatives, without ongoing government supervision.

History

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-273, § 3(c), 48 DCR 1637

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of subchapter V, “Permanent Guardianship”, consisting of §§ 16-2381 to 16-2399., see § 3(b) of the Foster Children’s Guardianship Temporary Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-208, April 4, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3239).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3(b) of the Foster Children’s Guardianship Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-490, December 18, 2000, 48 DCR 63).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3(c) of Foster Children’s Guardianship Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-4, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2254).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority Pursuant to the Foster Children’s Guardianship Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001, Effective 2-13-01, DC Act 14-4, and Any Substantially Identical Successor Legislation, Including the Foster Children’s Guardianship Act of 2000, see Mayor’s Order 2001-38, March 20, 2001 ( 48 DCR 3438).